test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-odd-stems.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

     ышташ+V+ConNeg: ыште

     йытыраяш+V+ConNeg: йытырае
     тояш+V+ConNeg: тойо
     шӱяш+V+ConNeg: шӱйӧ

     пуаш+V+ConNeg: [пу, пуо]
     куаш+V+ConNeg: [ку, куо]
     шуаш+V+ConNeg: [шу, шуо]

     каяш+V+ConNeg: [кай, кае]
     кияш+V+ConNeg: [кий, кие]
     лӱяш+V+ConNeg: [лӱй, лӱйӧ]
     мешаяш+V+ConNeg: [мешай, мешае]
     мияш+V+ConNeg: [мий, мие]
     намияш+V+ConNeg: [намий, намие]
     наҥгаяш+V+ConNeg: [нангай, нангае]
     пӱяш+V+ConNeg: [пӱй, пӱйӧ]
     тӱяш+V+ConNeg: [тӱй, тӱйӧ]
     чияш+V+ConNeg: [чий, чие]
